src/acro-sma-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

LEXICON Acronym

 +Use/Circ: FIRSTLETTER ;  ! Dynamically generated acronyms, 	! Remove these from nonrec?
               ! between two and four letters long.
 +Use/Circ: LETTERNUMBER ; ! Listed (still not monitored)		!
               ! Perhaps we should allow for a final arabic number at
               ! the end of the acronyms, the NRK and NRK2 pattern.
 +Use/Circ: SOMELONGACRO ; ! Here, we collect some long acronyms, perhaps we should  !
               ! open for dynamic generation of longer acronyms, if this
               ! list gets long.
 smallacro ;    ! This is a pointer to a lexicon of manually listed small-letter
               ! acronyms. They are not generated, since it would interfer with the
               ! ordinary transducer, but listed here, as they then can point to the
               ! same ACRO lexicon as the generated capital-letter acronyms.
 quasiacro ;    ! This is compounds with acronyms in the beginning.
                ! They are here since they make compounds with hyphen to the left.


LEXICON FIRSTLETTER
B SCND ; C SCND ; Č SCND ; D SCND ; Đ SCND ; F SCND ; G SCND ; 
H SCND ; J SCND ; K SCND ; L SCND ; M SCND ; N SCND ; Ŋ SCND ; 
P SCND ; R SCND ; S SCND ; Š SCND ; T SCND ; Ŧ SCND ; V SCND ; 
W SCND ; X SCND ; Z SCND ; Ž SCND ; 
A SCND ; Á SCND ; E SCND ; I SCND ; O SCND ; U SCND ; 
Æ SCND ; Ø SCND ; Y SCND ; Ä SCND ; Ö SCND ; Å SCND ; 

LEXICON SCND
B THRD ; C THRD ; Č THRD ; D THRD ; Đ THRD ; F THRD ; G THRD ; 
H THRD ; J THRD ; K THRD ; L THRD ; M THRD ; N THRD ; Ŋ THRD ; 
P THRD ; R THRD ; S THRD ; Š THRD ; T THRD ; Ŧ THRD ; V THRD ; 
W THRD ; X THRD ; Z THRD ; Ž THRD ; 
A THRD ; Á THRD ; E THRD ; I THRD ; O THRD ; U THRD ; 
Æ THRD ; Ø THRD ; Y THRD ; Ä THRD ; Ö THRD ; Å THRD ; 

LEXICON THRD
B FRTH ; C FRTH ; Č FRTH ; D FRTH ; Đ FRTH ; F FRTH ; G FRTH ; 
H FRTH ; J FRTH ; K FRTH ; L FRTH ; M FRTH ; N FRTH ; Ŋ FRTH ; 
P FRTH ; R FRTH ; S FRTH ; Š FRTH ; T FRTH ; Ŧ FRTH ; V FRTH ; 
W FRTH ; X FRTH ; Z FRTH ; Ž FRTH ; 
A FRTH ; Á FRTH ; E FRTH ; I FRTH ; O FRTH ; U FRTH ; 
Æ FRTH ; Ø FRTH ; Y FRTH ; Ä FRTH ; Ö FRTH ; Å FRTH ; 
  ACRO ;

LEXICON FRTH
B ACRO ; C ACRO ; Č ACRO ; D ACRO ; Đ ACRO ; F ACRO ; G ACRO ; 
H ACRO ; J ACRO ; K ACRO ; L ACRO ; M ACRO ; N ACRO ; Ŋ ACRO ; 
P ACRO ; R ACRO ; S ACRO ; Š ACRO ; T ACRO ; Ŧ ACRO ; V ACRO ; 
W ACRO ; X ACRO ; Z ACRO ; Ž ACRO ; 
A ACRO ; Á ACRO ; E ACRO ; I ACRO ; O ACRO ; U ACRO ; 
Æ ACRO ; Ø ACRO ; Y ACRO ; Ä ACRO ; Ö ACRO ; Å ACRO ; 
  ACRO ;

LEXICON ACRO              ! Here we add the POS tag
+N+ACR: acroconnector ;

LEXICON acroconnector     ! Here comes a set of possible symbols to
 +Use/Sub:%>   acrosuff ; ! put between the abbreviation and its suffix
 +Use/Sub:%>'  acrosuff ; ! No POS tag here in order to avoid the POS
 +Use/Sub:%>%´ acrosuff ; ! tag for non-ACRO entries using the acroconnector
 +Use/Sub:%>%` acrosuff ; ! inflection lexicon. (cf. the punct-sme-lex.txt file)
 :%>%:         acrosuff ;
               acronull ; ! SgNom only in sma
               RHyph    ; ! Acros compound with a hyphen

LEXICON acronull
+Sg+Nom: # ;

LEXICON acrosuff
+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:en   # ; 
+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:em   # ; 
+Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:asse # ;

+Sg+Gen:n       # ;
+Sg+Acc:m       # ;
+Sg+Ill:se      # ;
+Sg+Ine:sne     # ;   ! NRK:sne
+Sg+Ela:ste     # ;   ! NRK:ste
+Sg+Com:ine     # ;
+Pl+Nom:h       # ;  
+Pl+Gen:j       # ; 
+Pl+Acc:ide     # ; 
+Pl+Ill:ide     # ; 
+Pl+Ine:ine     # ; 
+Pl+Ela:jste    # ; 
+Pl+Com:jgujmie # ; 
+Ess:ine        # ;	! NBR:ine

LEXICON LETTERNUMBER
A5 ACRO ;
A3 ACRO ;
O97S ACRO ;
Bb ACRO ;
NRK1 ACRO ;
NRK2 ACRO ;
TV2 ACRO ;
E6 ACRO ;
LU1 ACRO ;
LU2 ACRO ;
P1 ACRO ;
P2 ACRO ;
A/L ACRO ;
A/S ACRO ;
ECHAM/OPYC3 ACRO ;
L/L ACRO ;
U19 ACRO ;
U-19 ACRO ;
U23 ACRO ;
U-23 ACRO ;
4-A ACRO ;
5-G ACRO ;
2-C ACRO ;
1-D ACRO ;
3-A ACRO ;
6-B ACRO ;
K/S ACRO ;
D/S ACRO ;
S/S ACRO ;
L-97 ACRO ;
L97S ACRO ;
LA21 ACRO ;
O-97 ACRO ;
4/OPYC ACRO ;
P3 ACRO ;
CSM_1 ACRO ;
Jk1 ACRO ;
P4 ACRO ;
P-1 ACRO ;
P-2 ACRO ;
P-3 ACRO ;
P-4 ACRO ;
SVT1 ACRO ;
SVT2 ACRO ;
SVT24 ACRO ;
TV4 ACRO ;
UU2 ACRO ;
Q-2 ACRO ;
T5PC ACRO ;
km/t ACRO ;
km/d ACRO ;
km/h ACRO ;
Jå1 ACRO ;
Jå2 ACRO ;
LEXICON SOMELONGACRO
 EXFACFON+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:EXFACFON ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
 EXFACHS+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:EXFACHS ACRO;   !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
xsl ACRO ;
xml ACRO ;
html ACRO ;
AAD ACRO ;
AKP ACRO ;
AMD ACRO ;
AMI ACRO ;
ANC ACRO ;
ANSI ACRO ;
AOF ACRO ;
AP ACRO ;
AUF ACRO ;
AB ACRO ;
BBC ACRO ; 
BBS ACRO ; 
BFD ACRO ; 
BMW ACRO ; 
BNP ACRO ; 
BP ACRO ; 
BRD ACRO ; 
BT ACRO ; 
 BASIC+Use/Sub:BASIC ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
DAK ACRO ;
DAP ACRO ;
DDR ACRO ;
DIN ACRO ;
DNV ACRO ;
SKINN ACRO ;
BDF ACRO ;
 UNIKOM+Use/Sub:UNIKOM ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
CCITT ACRO ;
 COCOM+Use/Sub:COCOM ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
 FORTRAN+Use/Sub:FORTRAN ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
FUG ACRO ;
MGP ACRO ;
 COMECON+Use/Sub:COMECON ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
ISAN ACRO ;
 UEFA+Use/Sub:UEFA ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
EFS ACRO ;
ICES ACRO ;
BT ACRO ;
EKG ACRO ;
NSR ACRO ;
NRK ACRO ;
NBR ACRO ;
 INTEREG+Use/Sub:INTEREG ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
 NIPIAA+Use/Sub:NIPIAA ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
MD ACRO ;
ARN ACRO ;
NTNU ACRO ;
BI ACRO ;
II ACRO ;
UR ACRO ;
ON ACRO ;
UN ACRO ;
MSN ACRO ;
EU ACRO ;
IOC ACRO ;
TV ACRO ;
IV ACRO ;
III ACRO ;
AS ACRO ;
JA ACRO ;
NOU ACRO ;
CD ACRO ;
BK ACRO ;
SKR ACRO ;
ILO ACRO ;
USA ACRO ;
USSR ACRO ;
SSO ACRO ;
SVL ACRO ;
IL ACRO ;
VI ACRO ;
SMK ACRO ;
SÅG ACRO ;
RD ACRO ;
GD ACRO ;
DD ACRO ;
JPD ACRO ;
OED ACRO ;
SOD ACRO ;
BHD ACRO ;
WC ACRO ;
AD ACRO ;
BNB ACRO ;
PM ACRO ;
ÅT ACRO ;
OT ACRO ;
ER ACRO ;
PPS ACRO ;
JOD ACRO ;
SG ACRO ;
HE ACRO ;
SF ACRO ;
BB ACRO ;
SPR ACRO ;
SSA ACRO ;
YLE ACRO ;
OS ACRO ;
OG ACRO ;
GLR ACRO ;
SNPN ACRO ;
FO ACRO ;
 ASVO+Use/Sub:ASVO ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
HBO ACRO ;
EES ACRO ;
EG ACRO ;
RDA ACRO ;
 NAVO+Use/Sub:NAVO ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
PPT ACRO ;
NVE ACRO ;
NAČ ACRO ;
IF ACRO ;
DJ ACRO ;
 UNESCO+Use/Sub:UNESCO ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
SNF ACRO ;
ETS ACRO ;
NEG ACRO ;
LEA ACRO ;
SÁB ACRO ;
DL ACRO ;
SEG ACRO ;
SVD ACRO ;
SVT ACRO ;
IPS ACRO ;
TIL ACRO ;
GOD ACRO ;
GB ACRO ;
VS ACRO ;
OSL ACRO ;
FFF ACRO ;
SDD ACRO ;
VII ACRO ;
IKT ACRO ;
KLM ACRO ;
SAFE ACRO ;
SJ ACRO ;
NSB ACRO ;
VR ACRO ;
SIFI ACRO ;
AR ACRO ;
 ILIOS+Use/Sub:ILIOS ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
AN ACRO ;
NKS ACRO ;
SVL-N ACRO ;
SVL-S ACRO ;
EO ACRO ;
SND ACRO ;
SM ACRO ;
FFR ACRO ;
RS ACRO ;
NNS ACRO ;
IS ACRO ;
PC ACRO ;
KSS ACRO ;
GO ACRO ;
WHO ACRO ;
NIBR ACRO ;
FD ACRO ;
BONO ACRO ;
VBL ACRO ;
 NATO+Use/Sub:NATO ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
KPK ACRO ;
HO ACRO ;
SSL ACRO ;
YSS ACRO ;
VG ACRO ;
SSB ACRO ;
FFA ACRO ;
PFK ACRO ;
IT ACRO ;
SLF ACRO ;
SAS ACRO ;
BUL ACRO ;
SSF ACRO ;
SL ACRO ;
SFS ACRO ;
DAT ACRO ;
BA ACRO ;
UKM ACRO ;
STIL ACRO ;
SGP ACRO ;
SF ACRO ;
SDS ACRO ;
MNP ACRO ;
AP ACRO ;
TCO ACRO ;
HFK ACRO ;
SGS ACRO ;
SÁL ACRO ;
NOK ACRO ;
NJFF ACRO ;
NJ ACRO ;
IN ACRO ;
RV ACRO ;
SOL ACRO ;
SKES ACRO ;
OD ACRO ;
MK ACRO ;
FIM ACRO ;
FAB ACRO ;
DN ACRO ;
POT ACRO ;
DA ACRO ;
OSS ACRO ;
NM ACRO ;
EAI ACRO ;
HK ACRO ;
DSF ACRO ;
RUF ACRO ;
OB ACRO ;
LO ACRO ;
KF ACRO ;
SOG ACRO ;
NN ACRO ;
FMX ACRO ;
SR ACRO ;
NGO ACRO ;
MBD ACRO ;
LEI ACRO ;
HIV ACRO ;
RSS ACRO ;
ISBN ACRO ;
VUK ACRO ;
PS ACRO ;
JPG ACRO ;
GSS ACRO ;
GSM ACRO ;
AUF ACRO ;
SJS ACRO ;
MW ACRO ;
ANS ACRO ;
SS ACRO ;
SNO ACRO ;
SFF ACRO ;
RO ACRO ;
FAF ACRO ;
SSG ACRO ;
LKAB ACRO ;
KKS ACRO ;
ICC ACRO ;
SNJ ACRO ;
SI ACRO ;
PIL ACRO ;
NOR ACRO ;
NÁČ ACRO ;
MS ACRO ;
ILO ACRO ;
DÁL ACRO ;
BOF ACRO ;
 AIDS+Use/Sub:AIDS ACRO;!  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
UNTAK ACRO ;
NINA ACRO ;
GL ACRO ;
GGD ACRO ;
FUOM ACRO ;
FK ACRO ;
ASA ACRO ;
ODD ACRO ;
MEGA ACRO ;
KS ACRO ;
 UNICEF+Use/Sub:UNICEF ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
SDR ACRO ;
 REMA+Use/Sub:REMA ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
OHCAN ACRO ;
KJSS ACRO ;
CERD ACRO ;
USKAV ACRO ;
SD ACRO ;
NSR-N ACRO ;
SSSR ACRO ;
SB ACRO ;
NIF ACRO ;
MÁ ACRO ;
GJ ACRO ;
DON ACRO ;
CO ACRO ;
YEH ACRO ;
UNN ACRO ;
SF-012 ACRO ;
OH ACRO ;
LMK ACRO ;
IW ACRO ;
GDL ACRO ;
SAÁO ACRO ;
NČE ACRO ;
FN ACRO ;
TONO ACRO ;
SÁ ACRO ;
MGD ACRO ;
JSL ACRO ;
FE ACRO ;
DVD ACRO ;
CIA ACRO ;
UD ACRO ;
SFO ACRO ;
OL ACRO ;
 MUVÁ+Use/Sub:MUVÁ ACRO; ! MuVá
MIEHTÁ ACRO ;
LLH ACRO ;
FAS ACRO ;
ESA ACRO ;
DNA ACRO ;
ADSL ACRO ;
UDI ACRO ;
SK ACRO ;
NMK ACRO ;
JK ACRO ;
EEK ACRO ;
DS ACRO ;
DAB ACRO ;
BOL ACRO ;
AL ACRO ;
WWF ACRO ;
SUF ACRO ;
SLČ ACRO ;
SBB ACRO ;
KD ACRO ;
ILUS ACRO ;
IDE ACRO ;
FS ACRO ;
FÁGA ACRO ;
DPS ACRO ;
BBC ACRO ;
 ÁJA+Use/Sub:ÁJA ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
VM ACRO ;
SKS ACRO ;
ISA ACRO ;
SDGB ACRO ;
MNOSS ACRO ;
LU ACRO ;
JL ACRO ;
DSE ACRO ;
 ÁLGU+Use/Sub:ÁLGU ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
TT ACRO ;
SUS ACRO ;
SEK ACRO ;
NASCO ACRO ;
 KRIPOS+Use/Sub:KRIPOS ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
KGD ACRO ;
HRW ACRO ;
DSJ ACRO ;
BUP ACRO ;
BU ACRO ;
WWM ACRO ;
WINHEC ACRO ;
US ACRO ;
UNEP ACRO ;
SRV ACRO ;
SBSS ACRO ;
NSD ACRO ;
MMI ACRO ;
KIM ACRO ;
HVS ACRO ;
GS ACRO ;
FC ACRO ;
EN ACRO ;
EEC ACRO ;
EM ACRO ;
EDB ACRO ;
DIR ACRO ;
BNO ACRO ;
APTN ACRO ;
UDSL ACRO ;
SU ACRO ;
SSR ACRO ;
SFR ACRO ;
SAP ACRO ;
RAG ACRO ;
PFL ACRO ;
OLU ACRO ;
NTB ACRO ;
NB ACRO ;
LOBI ACRO ;
KBB ACRO ;
IWGIA ACRO ;
IIIA ACRO ;
GJSL ACRO ;
FPPS ACRO ;
FA ACRO ;
DT ACRO ;
CC ACRO ;
AYC ACRO ;
UNG ACRO ;
UB ACRO ;
SIVA ACRO ;
SGRN ACRO ;
KM ACRO ;
KR ACRO ;
SOR ACRO ;
 SEFO+Use/Sub:SEFO ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
 SATØ+Use/Sub:SATØ ACRO; ! SATø
SAF ACRO ;
RNNU ACRO ;
RBK ACRO ;
RSDAP ACRO ;
RMS ACRO ;
TD ACRO ;
ORO ACRO ;
 OASIS+Use/Sub:OASIS ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
NINA-NIKU ACRO ;
NHO ACRO ;
NAF ACRO ;
DKS ACRO ;
MBL ACRO ;
KLP ACRO ;
KAB ACRO ;
ISDN ACRO ;
GJSS ACRO ;
FAO ACRO ;
DSI ACRO ;
DÁ ACRO ;
BES ACRO ;
ASS ACRO ;
 ACTA+Use/Sub:ACTA ACRO;!  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
VVS ACRO ;
ERUF ACRO ;
 BIBSYS+Use/Sub:BIBSYS ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
SKUP ACRO ;
LSD ACRO ;
MP ACRO ;
CBS ACRO ;
IRE ACRO ;
INRI ACRO ;
RAF ACRO ;
EØF ACRO ;
FID ACRO ;
JD ACRO ;
K.F.U.M ACRO ;
KUD ACRO ;
MG ACRO ;
MS-DOS ACRO ;
MVD ACRO ;
NEP ACRO ;
NKP ACRO ;
NRF ACRO ;
NT ACRO ;
OCR ACRO ;
OECD ACRO ;
SHD ACRO ;
SUN ACRO ;
LEXICON smallacro
 as ACRO ; !A/S
NTNu ACRO ;
cd ACRO ;
mánáj-tv:mánáj-tv ACRO ;
teaksta-tv ACRO ;
AciA ACRO ;
AiS ACRO ;
Lo ACRO ;
Uio ACRO ;
Bb ACRO ;
DuÅ ACRO ;
BfS ACRO ;
WHo ACRO ;
 FeFo+Use/Sub:FeFo ACRO;  !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
ISo ACRO ;
EtMk ACRO ;
FGb ACRO ;
FoU ACRO ;
FrS ACRO ;
Ger ACRO ;
Gwh ACRO ;
ImO ACRO ;
Ji ACRO ;
KBb ACRO ;
SVL-Fi ACRO ;
KoKS ACRO ;
KrÁ ACRO ;
LaMk ACRO ;
LuW ACRO ;
 Med-fak+Use/Sub:Med-fak ACRO;  !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
NgL ACRO ;
 Norfu+Use/Sub:Norfu ACRO;  !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
Rp ACRO ;
pc ACRO ;
SamS ACRO ;
kB ACRO ;
lsd ACRO ;
wc ACRO ;
SfF ACRO ;
Sfruo ACRO ;
StA ACRO ;
UiO ACRO ;
 UiTø+Use/Sub:UiTø ACRO;  !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
SvJT ACRO ;
SUKPb ACRO ;
PhD ACRO ;
FrP ACRO ;
